da: Filmformat: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; I-type-film; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70-film; Spectra-film; Zinkpapir; Andet
de: Filmformat: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 Film; 8x10; APS; I-Type-Film; Instax Mini; Instax SQUARE; Instax WIDE; Polaroid; SX-70 Film; Spectra-Film; Zinkpapier; Sonstiges
el: Μορφή φιλμ: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; I-type film; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70 film; Spectra film; Zink paper; Άλλο
vi: Định dạng phim: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; Phim 600; 8x10; APS; Phim I-type; Instax Mini; Instax Square; Instax Wide; Ảnh polaroid; Phim SX-70; Phim quang phổ; Giấy Zink; Khác
it: Formato della pellicola: 120/220; 35mm; 4x5; 5 x 7; Pellicola 600; 8x10; APS; Pellicola I-type; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; Pellicola SX-70; Pellicola spectra; Carta zincata; Altro
pl: Format filmu: 120/220; 35mm; 4x5; 5x7; folia 600; 8x10; APS; Folia typu I; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; Film SX-70; Film Spectra; Papier cynkowy; Inne
sk-SK: Formát filmu: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; Film typu I; Instax mini; Instax štvorec; Instax široký; Polaroid; Film SX-70; Film Spectra; Zinkový papier; Iné
tr: Film Formatı: 120/220; 35mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; I tipi film; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70 filmi; Spektrum film; Çinko kağıt; Diğer
th: รูปแบบภาพยนตร์: 120/220; 35 มม.; 4x5; 5x7; ฟิล์ม 600; 8x10; APS; ฟิล์ม I-type; อินสแตกซ์ มินิ; อินสแตกซ์ สแควร์; อินสแตกซ์ ไวด์; โพลารอยด์; ฟิล์ม SX-70; ฟิล์ม Spectra; กระดาษ Zink; อื่นๆ
es: Formato de película: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; Película 600; 8x10; APS; Película tipo I; Instax mini; Instax cuadrada; Instax ancha; Polaroid; Película SX-70; Película Spectra; Papel Zink; Otros
hr-HR: Format filma: 120/220; 35 mm; 4 x 5; 5x7; 600 film; 8 x 10; APS; Film I-type; Instax mini; Instax kvadratni; Instax široki; Polaroid; SX-70 film; Spectra film; Cink-papir; Ostalo
pt-BR: Formato de filme: 120/220; 35mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 filme; 8x10; APS; Filme tipo I; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; Filme SX-70; Filme Spectra; Papel Zink; Outro
sl-SI: Format filma: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; Film tipa I; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70 film; Spectra film; Cinkov papir; Drugo
en: Film format: 120/220; 35mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; I-type film; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70 film; Spectra film; Zink paper; Other
nl: Filmformaat: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; i-Type film; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70 film; Spectra film; ZINK papier; Andere
nb: Filmformat: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600-film; 8x10; APS; I-typefilm; Instax mini; Instax kvadrat; Instax bred; Polaroid; SX-70-film; Spektrafilm; Sinkpapir; Annet
ko: 필름 형식: 120/220; 35mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 필름; 8x10; APS; I형 필름; 인스탁스 미니; 인스탁스 스퀘어; 인스탁스 와이드; 폴라로이드; SX-70 필름; 스펙트라 필름; 아연지; 기타
zh-TW: 底片格式: 120/220; 35毫米; 4x5; 5x7; 600 膠卷; 8x10; APS; I 型底片; 迷你拍立得; 方形拍立得; 寬版拍立得; 寶麗來; SX-70 底片; Spectra 底片; 零墨水相紙; 其他
hu: Film formátuma: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; I-type film; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70 film; Spectra film; Zink papír; Egyéb
zh-CN: 胶片格式: 120/220; 35 毫米; 4x5; 5x7; 600 胶片; 8x10; APS; I 型胶片; 一次成像迷你; 一次成像方形; 一次成像宽幅; Polaroid; SX-70 胶片; 光谱胶片; 锌纸; 其他
fi: Filmiformaatti: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600-filmi; 8x10; APS; I-tyypin filmi; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70-filmi; Spectra-filmi; Sinkkipaperi; Muu
sv: Filmformat: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5 x 7; 600-film; 8x10; APS; I-type-film; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; SX-70-film; Spectra-film; Zink paper; Övrigt
pt-PT: Formato de filme: 120/220; 35 mm; 4 x 5; 5 x 7; 600 filme; 8x10; APS; Filme tipo I; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaróide; Filme SX-70; Spectra film; Papel zink; Outro
ro-RO: Format film: 120/220; 35mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 film; 8x10; APS; Film tip I; Instax mini; Instax pătrat; Instax lat; Polaroid; Film SX-70; Film Spectra; Hârtie zincată; Altele
ru: Формат пленки: 120/220; 35 мм; 4x5; 5x7; Пленка 600; 8x10; APS; Пленка типа I; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; Пленка SX-70; Пленка Spectra; Цинковая бумага; Другой
ja: フィルムフォーマット: 120/220; 35mm; 4x5; 5 x 7; 600フィルム; 8x10; APS; i-Typeフィルム; チェキミニ; チェキスクエア; チェキワイド; ポラロイド; SX-70フィルム; Spectraフィルム; Zinkペーパー; その他
bg-BG: Формат на филма: 120/220; 35 мм; 4x5; 5x7; 600 филм; 8x10; APS; Филм тип I; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; Филм SX-70; Филм Spectra; Цинкова хартия; Други
fr: Format du film: 120/220; 35 mm; 4 x 5; 5x7; Film 600; 8 x 10; APS; Film type I; Instax Mini; Instax Square; Instax Wide; Polaroïd; Film SX-70; Film Spectra; Papier Zink; Autre
lt-LT: Juostelės formatas: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; 600 fotoplokštelė; 8x10; APS; I tipo fotoplokštelė; „Instax mini“; „Instax square“; „Instax wide“; „Polaroid“; SX-70 fotoplokštelė; „Spectra“ fotoplokštelė; „Zink“ fotopopierius; Kita
cs: Formát filmu: 120/220; 35 mm; 4x5; 5x7; Film 600; 8x10; APS; Film typu I; Instax mini; Instax square; Instax wide; Polaroid; Film SX-70; Film Spectra; Zinkový papír; Jiné